Washington statutes.
RCW 26.44.105

Information about rights—Oral and written information—Copies of dependency petition and any court order.

Whenever a dependency petition is filed by the department, it shall advise the parents, and any child over the age of twelve who is subject to the dependency action, of their respective rights under RCW 13.34.090. The parents and the child shall be provided a copy of the dependency petition and a copy of any court orders which have been issued. This advice of rights under RCW 13.34.090 shall be in writing. The department caseworker shall also make reasonable efforts to advise the parent and child of these same rights orally.

[ 2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 326; 1985 c 183 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 ss 102, 104-115, 201-227, 301-337, 401-419, 501-513, 801-803, and 805-822: See note following RCW 43.216.025.

Conflict with federal requirements—2017 3rd sp.s. c 6: See RCW 43.216.908.